Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2089
Receiver; litigation authorized.

The receiver in its discretion may, but shall not be required to, defend any claim, suit, or action against the receiver or the health care facility arising out of conditions, actions, or circumstances occurring or continuing at the health care facility after the appointment of the receiver. The receiver in its discretion may, but shall not be required to, defend any licensure, certification, or injunctive action initiated by the department after its appointment. The receiver shall not appeal or continue the appeal of any licensure or certification action initiated by the department against the health care facility before the appointment of the receiver. The receiver shall cooperate with the owner or operator in any defense undertaken by the owner or operator against any claim, suit, or action against him or her or the health care facility, including, but not limited to, any licensure, certification, or injunctive action taken by the department.

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 65.